Georgia statutes. 
Code Commission notes. - Ga. L. 1992, p. 1348, § 1, and Ga. L. 1992, p. 1352, § 2, both added a new subsection (g). Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, the subsection as added by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1352, § 2 was redesignated as subsection (h).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Application. - Trial court properly granted summary judgment to a county and purchaser because the prior owner of the property condemned by the county never had a binding contract with the county to re-purchase a remnant, unused portion and there was no conflict between O.C.G.A. §§ 32-7-3, 32-7-4, and 36-9-3(h) and the county's code amendment. Hubert Props., LLP v. Cobb County, 318 Ga. App. 321, 733 S.E.2d 373 (2012).

Heirs unable to repurchase because bona fide purchaser had purchased. - Although a county failed to comply with O.C.G.A. § 36-9-2 by recording a transfer in the minutes when the county conveyed the county's interest in property, which the county had formerly acquired by eminent domain, to the county development authority, a subsequent purchaser was a bona fide purchaser without notice of this irregularity under O.C.G.A. § 23-1-20, so that the county's title was superior to that of the condemnee's heirs, who sought to repurchase the property under O.C.G.A. § 36-9-3(g)(3)(B). Darling Int'l, Inc. v. Carter, 294 Ga. 455, 754 S.E.2d 347 (2014).

Cited in John Doe v. Roe, 234 Ga. 127, 214 S.E.2d 880 (1975).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Effect of local constitutional amendment. - A local amendment which allows resale of county real estate upon such terms and conditions as the governing authority of that county shall deem proper supersedes this section. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U76-52.

County need not follow procedures set forth in this section before conveying unserviceable county property to body corporate and politic. 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U80-43.

Lease of property for school purposes. - Counties and school districts have authority under subsection (c) of O.C.G.A. § 36-9-3 and O.C.G.A. § 20-2-520 to enter into intergovernmental contracts in which the county leases real property to the school board for use as a site for a public school or other educational purpose. 1998 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 98-13.

Applicability to board of education. - This section has no application to sales of property, the title to which is vested in a county board of education. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 107.

Sale of property by county boards of education. - County board of education may convey property no longer needed for school purposes by a private sale. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-31.

Since O.C.G.A. § 20-2-520 vests title to school property in the county boards of education, as opposed to the counties themselves, public sale requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-9-3, which apply only to county property, do not govern disposition of such property. 1982 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 82-31.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Power of governing body of county to dispose of county real estate in absence of specific statutory authority, 21 A.L.R.2d 722.

36-9-4. Maintenance of insurance on books of laws and court reports.

Statute text

The officer having charge of the financial affairs of each county shall keep insured, at a fair valuation against loss by fire, all volumes of the public laws and decisions of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals which have been furnished to the judge of the probate court and the clerk of the superior court of his county. Such policies of insurance shall be in the name of the county. The premiums therefor shall be paid out of the funds of the county. In the event of any loss or damage by fire, the county governing authority shall proceed to collect the amount of loss on the policy; when so collected, the proceeds thereof shall be used in supplying new books of the kind lost or injured, insofar as the proceeds may be sufficient to do so.

History

(Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 132, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1895, §§ 349, 350; Civil Code 1910, §§ 397, 398; Code 1933, §§ 91-603, 91-604.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Property insurance, T. 33, C. 32.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 484.

36-9-5. Erection, repair, and furnishing of county buildings; storage of county documents.

Statute text

(a) It is the duty of the county governing authorities to erect or repair, when necessary, their respective courthouses and jails and all other necessary county buildings and to furnish each with all the furniture necessary for the different rooms, offices, or cells.

(b) The county buildings shall be erected and kept in order and repaired at the expense of the county under the direction of the county governing authority which is authorized to make all necessary contracts for that purpose.

(c) (1) As used in this subsection, the term "county document" means:

(A) Records documenting property rights, deeds, and wills; and

(B) Tax records documenting ownership of property and the latest valuations of property.

(2) A county officer, the county board of tax assessors, or any other officer of the county having the responsibility or custody of any county documents set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall, at night or when the county office is closed, keep such county documents:

(A) In a fireproof safe or vault;

(B) In fireproof cabinets;

(C) On microfilm, pursuant to the standards set forth in Article 6 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, only if a security copy has been sent to the Georgia State Archives;

(D) At a location not more than 100 miles from the county in a data storage and retrieval facility approved by the county governing authority within the State of Georgia which is in a building or facility which is in compliance with the fire safety standards applicable to archives and record centers as established by the National Fire Protection Association in Standard No. 232, as such standard was adopted on August 11, 1995. If documents are stored outside the county where the documents were created, the government entity shall bear all costs of transporting such documents back to the county of origin for purposes of responding to requests under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to inspections of public records. Such documents shall be made available to the requester; or

(E) On any other electronic imaging medium that facilitates retrieval of such documents via electronic means, provided that such medium enables conversion of such documents to future electronic imaging technologies and provided that such custodian creates a daily computer-based backup of all archival documents stored on such medium.

(3) It is the duty of the county governing authorities to furnish the necessary fireproof equipment, microfilming equipment and supplies, or some other safe facility for such county documents.

(4) On and after January 1, 1985, county documents shall be stored only in accordance with the provisions of this subsection. The local fire marshal in each county shall monitor the various county offices in the county to assure compliance with the provisions of this subsection.

History

(Laws 1796, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 182; Code 1863, §§ 468, 469; Code 1868, §§ 530, 531; Code 1873, §§ 496, 497; Code 1882, §§ 496, 497; Civil Code 1895, §§ 351, 352; Civil Code 1910, §§ 399, 400; Code 1933, §§ 91-701, 91-702; Ga. L. 1983, p. 653, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 925, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 173, § 1-32/HB 665.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Authority exclusively granted to county. - Authority granted under O.C.G.A. § 36-9-5(a) is given exclusively to the county and is not shared with the city. Therefore, the county does not need the city's approval before condemning property within the city limits when, as here, the condemnation is reasonably necessary to provide a public service. Brunswick Landing, LLC v. Glynn County, 301 Ga. App. 288, 687 S.E.2d 271 (2009), cert. denied, No. S10C0558, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 246 (Ga. 2010).

Power of commissioners. - County commissioners with power to levy and tax also have the power to act. Dunn v. O'Neill, 144 Ga. 823, 88 S.E. 190 (1916).

Authority to levy tax. - Ordinary (now judge of the probate court) had the power to levy an extra tax to carry into effect the provisions of this section, without the recommendation of the grand jury, but the order levying such extra tax should clearly and distinctly state the object and purpose for which the tax is levied. Barlow v. Ordinary of Sumter County, 47 Ga. 639 (1873).

Discretion of county officers. - Necessities of the various counties in regard to these matters are to be determined by the peculiar conditions surrounding each county; and, therefore, the sound judgment of the county authorities in each case must be relied upon to provide the public with proper buildings on the one hand, and to protect the taxpayer from useless and unnecessary burdens in regard to such matters on the other. Commissioners of Habersham County v. Porter Mfg. Co., 103 Ga. 613, 30 S.E. 547 (1898).

Authority to build courthouse. - Local Act giving board of commissioners jurisdiction over county matters authorizes the board of commissioners to contract for building of county courthouse. Matthews v. Hussey, 148 Ga. 526, 97 S.E. 437 (1918).

Officers having jurisdiction of county affairs are not deprived of all discretion as to the manner of providing a courthouse or the character of the building or the building's equipment. On that subject the county authorities have broad discretion, which should not be disturbed by the courts except cautiously, nor unless it is clear and manifest that the county authorities are abusing the discretion vested in the authorities by law. Manry v. Gleaton, 164 Ga. 402, 138 S.E. 777 (1927); Cowart v. Manry, 166 Ga. 612, 144 S.E. 21 (1928).

Power to donate to chamber of commerce. - When the applicable revenue statutes were construed together with Ga. Const. 1877, Art. VII, Sec. XVI, Paras. I and II and Art. VII, Sec. VI, Para. II and Art. IX, Sec. V, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI and Art. IX, Sec. IV), it was held that the statutes did not confer power or authority on a county board of commissioners to donate county funds derived from taxation or from other sources to a chamber of commerce, freight bureau, or convention and tourist bureau even if such donations were intended to accomplish a lawful purpose. Atlanta Chamber of Commerce v. McRae, 174 Ga. 590, 163 S.E. 701 (1932).

Sheriff had power to modify county-owned property within exclusive use. - County sheriff had the independent authority to repaint and remark county-owned sheriff's vehicles assigned to the sheriff's exclusive use, but lacked the authority to modify portions of a county-owned building in which the sheriff's office and jail were housed, as the facility was shared with the superior, state, and magistrate courts of Clayton County, as well as the clerks of those courts, the solicitor general, and the district attorney, and hence, not under the sheriff's exclusive use. As a result, subject to compliance with O.C.G.A. § 40-8-91, summary judgment in favor of the county as to the extent of the sheriff's authority was reversed as to the former, but affirmed as to the latter. Hill v. Clayton County Bd. of Comm'rs, 283 Ga. App. 15, 640 S.E.2d 638 (2006), overruled on other grounds, Mayor & Aldermen of Savannah v. Batson-Cook Co., 291 Ga. 114, 728 S.E.2d 189 (Ga. 2012).

County was authorized to exercise the county's right of eminent domain in connection with the expansion of a detention center because the county had jurisdiction over the maintenance of jails in the county under O.C.G.A. § 36-9-5(a), the operation of a jail constituted a public purpose pursuant to Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. V, and the property owner did not identify any general law limiting the right of the county to exercise the county's power of eminent domain. Brunswick Landing, LLC v. Glynn County, 301 Ga. App. 288, 687 S.E.2d 271 (2009), cert. denied, No. S10C0558, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 246 (Ga. 2010).

Cited in Atlanta Title & Trust Co. v. Tidwell, 173 Ga. 499, 160 S.E. 620 (1931); Turner v. Johnston, 183 Ga. 176, 187 S.E. 864 (1936); Jackson v. Gasses, 230 Ga. 712, 198 S.E.2d 657 (1973); Wheeler v. DeKalb County, 249 Ga. 678, 292 S.E.2d 855 (1982); Manders v. Lee, 338 F.3d 1304 (11th Cir. 2003); Lawson v. Lincoln County, 292 Ga. App. 527, 664 S.E.2d 900 (2008).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Judges' and clerks' offices at courthouse. - Judges of the probate courts and clerks of the superior courts, being constitutional county officers, have a right to maintain their offices in the county courthouse, unless special circumstances make it impractical for judges and clerks to be located there. 1978 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 78-15.

Office of county school superintendent is not required to be located in county courthouse. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 66-31.

Storage of records at home. - It is not proper for a county tax commissioner to store tax records in the commissioner's home. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-75.

Unauthorized poll. - In the absence of any statutory authority, the board of commissioners would not be authorized to expend county funds to conduct an election in the nature of a "straw vote" or public opinion poll to determine whether to construct a new county building. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-70.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 478 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 221.

ALR. - Applicability of municipal building regulation to state or county buildings, 31 A.L.R. 450.

36-9-6. Courthouse rooms to be used by county officers.

Statute text

The county governing authority shall designate the rooms in the courthouse to be occupied by each of the county officers and enter the same on its minutes, which it may change from time to time as convenience may require.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 470; Code 1868, § 532; Code 1873, § 498; Code 1882, § 498; Civil Code 1895, § 353; Civil Code 1910, § 401; Code 1933, § 91-703.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Public access. - Courthouse is a public building, and as a matter of course the public does not require any permission to enter therein at suitable times and under reasonable regulations. All persons must be allowed equal privileges, both as to access to documents and as to reasonable space within which to transact business incident to the examination of the public records. Atlanta Title & Trust Co. v. Tidwell, 173 Ga. 499, 160 S.E. 620 (1931).

The expression "county officers," as used in this section, refers to those officers who are such in the strict sense of the term - that is, those who are constitutional county officers; and the officers are such, under the provisions of the Constitution, as shall be elected under Ga. Const. 1877, Art. XI, Sec. II, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III). It does not apply to a city court solicitor. Graham v. Merritt, 165 Ga. 489, 141 S.E. 298 (1928).

Justice of the peace (now magistrate) elected by the people is not a "county officer" within the meaning of this section, and therefore is not, as a matter of law or right, entitled to have a room in the courthouse for use as an office or place of holding court. McDonald v. Marshall, 185 Ga. 438, 195 S.E. 571 (1938).

Cited in Turner v. Johnston, 183 Ga. 176, 187 S.E. 864 (1936); Truesdel v. Freeney, 186 Ga. 288, 197 S.E. 783 (1938).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Judges' and clerks' offices at courthouse. - Judges of the probate courts and clerks of the superior courts, being constitutional county officers, have a right to maintain their offices in the county courthouse, unless special circumstances make it impractical for the judges and clerks to be located there. 1978 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 78-15.

36-9-7. Furnishing of supplies for county offices.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the county governing authority to furnish fuel, lights, furniture, stationery, records, and office supplies in general for the different county offices of the county, at the expense of the county, provided that this Code section shall apply only to the offices of the officers in the courthouse in the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1901, p. 62, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 402; Code 1933, § 91-704.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

County officer having office in courthouse is entitled to have all office supplies and equipment reasonably necessary to maintain an office in a modern up-to-date manner. Floyd County v. Graham, 24 Ga. App. 294, 100 S.E. 728 (1919).

Telephone included. - Phrase "office supplies in general" is broad enough to include telephone. Floyd County v. Graham, 24 Ga. App. 294, 100 S.E. 728 (1919).

Cited in Turner v. Johnston, 183 Ga. 176, 187 S.E. 864 (1936).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County officers generally. - County officer having an office in the courthouse is entitled to have all office supplies and equipment reasonably necessary to maintain an office in a modern up-to-date manner, corresponding with officers of similar character responsible for a like amount of work. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 39.

County governing authority is required to furnish county officials with supplies for their offices. 1960-61 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 68.

Board of education. - It is the responsibility of the county to furnish the offices of the county board of education so long as those officers remain in the courthouse. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 492.

School superintendent. - When a county has provided the county's school superintendent with an office in the county courthouse, the county is required to furnish and equip such office. 1963-65 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 669.

Jail. - County is responsible for keeping and cleaning the jail and for paying for the labor and materials used in such maintenance. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-261.

Costs of forms provided. - County commissioners must bear the cost of printed forms used in recording mortgages. 1948-49 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 39.

Remedy of mandamus. - Proper procedure for a refusal to comply with this section would be by writ of mandamus. 1958-59 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 39.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 260.

36-9-8. Protection of county property by sheriff.

Statute text

The public grounds and other county property are placed in the keeping of the sheriff of the county, subject to the order of the county governing authority; and it is his or her duty to preserve them from injury or waste and to prevent intrusions upon them.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 471; Code 1868, § 533; Code 1873, § 499; Code 1882, § 499; Civil Code 1895, § 354; Civil Code 1910, § 403; Code 1933, § 91-705; Ga. L. 2006, p. 560, § 2/SB 462.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in McDonald v. Marshall, 185 Ga. 438, 195 S.E. 571 (1938); Favors v. State, 104 Ga. App. 854, 123 S.E.2d 207 (1961); Wheeler v. DeKalb County, 249 Ga. 678, 292 S.E.2d 855 (1982); Dorsey v. State, 279 Ga. 534, 615 S.E.2d 512 (2005).

36-9-9. Construction of county jails.

Statute text

The county jails hereafter constructed shall be of sufficient size and strength to contain and keep securely the prisoners who may be confined therein and shall contain at least two apartments, one for males and one for females, which are properly ventilated so as to secure the health of those confined therein.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 473; Code 1868, § 535; Code 1873, § 501; Code 1882, § 501; Civil Code 1895, § 355; Civil Code 1910, § 404; Code 1933, § 91-706.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Jails generally, T. 42, C. 4.

State and county correctional institutions generally, T. 42, C. 5.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 269.

36-9-10. Inspection of county buildings, property, and records by grand jury.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 607, § 12, effective July 1, 1994.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Orig. Code 1863, § 476; Code 1868, § 538; Code 1873, § 504; Code 1882, § 504; Civil Code 1895, § 359; Civil Code 1910, § 408; Code 1933, § 91-708; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1053, § 2.

36-9-11. Destruction or damaging of any county building or its appurtenances or furniture.

Statute text

Any person who designedly destroys, injures, or defaces any public building or its appurtenances or furniture or uses the same for an indecent purpose shall be liable for the damages and shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 472; Code 1868, § 534; Code 1873, § 500; Code 1882, § 500; Civil Code 1895, § 358; Penal Code 1895, § 725; Civil Code 1910, § 407; Penal Code 1910, § 777; Code 1933, §§ 91-707, 91-9903.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Criminal penalty for destroying, damaging, or otherwise affecting government property, § 16-7-24.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Applicability to town jail. - This section applies to all holdings owned by a state or the state's subdivisions, including a town jail. Shepherd v. State, 16 Ga. App. 248, 85 S.E. 83 (1915).

Urinating on courthouse door-facing a misdemeanor. - Entering a courthouse and urinating against the door-facing therein is a misdemeanor, whether as a result thereof the building is injured or defaced or not. Smith v. State, 110 Ga. 292, 35 S.E. 166 (1900).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 52 Am. Jur. 2d, Malicious Mischief and Related Offenses, §§ 1, 3, 5, 7, 8, 22.

C.J.S. - 54 C.J.S., Malicious or Criminal Mischief, §§ 1, 2.

——————————

CHAPTER 10

PUBLIC WORKS CONTRACTS

Sec.

36-10-1. Contracts to be in writing and entered on minutes.

36-10-2. Letting of contracts for public works [Repealed].

36-10-2.1. Letting by counties with population of 800,000 or more.

36-10-2.2. Letting by certain counties with population of more than 150,000.

36-10-3 through 36-10-5 [Repealed].

Annotations

Cross references. - Power of counties to contract for public road purposes, § 32-4-60 et seq.

Law reviews. - For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

For note, "The Legal Nature of Public Purpose Authorities: Governmental, Private, or Neither," see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 680 (1974).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Home Indem. Co. v. Battey Mach. Co., 109 Ga. App. 322, 136 S.E.2d 193 (1964).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Applicability of state statutes or municipal regulations to contracts for performance of work on land owned or leased by the federal government, 91 A.L.R. 779; 115 A.L.R. 371; 127 A.L.R. 827.

Construction and effect of "changed conditions" clause in public works or construction contract with state or its subdivision, 56 A.L.R.4th 1042.

Public contracts: low bidder's monetary relief against state or local agency for nonaward of contract, 65 A.L.R.4th 93.

What are "prevailing wages," or the like, for purposes of state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 7 A.L.R.5th 400.

Employers subject to state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 7 A.L.R.5th 444.

What projects involve work subject to state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 10 A.L.R.5th 337.

Employees' private right of action to enforce state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 10 A.L.R.5th 360.

36-10-1. Contracts to be in writing and entered on minutes.

Statute text

All contracts entered into by the county governing authority with other persons in behalf of the county shall be in writing and entered on its minutes.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 465; Code 1868, § 527; Code 1873, § 493; Code 1882, § 493; Civil Code 1895, § 343; Civil Code 1910, § 386; Code 1933, § 23-1701.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying important general legal principles of municipal and county government purchasing and contracting in Georgia, see 16 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (1965). For article surveying 1979 developments in Georgia contract law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 27 (1979). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of county contracts from June 1979 through May 1980, see 32 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (1980). For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001). For survey article on construction law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (2003). For annual survey of local government law, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 267 (2006). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008). For annual survey on local government law, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2013).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Enforceability of Contracts

Entry upon Minutes

Types of Contracts

Procedure

General Consideration

Policy. - This section is designed to keep the public's business open to inspection. Thus, no one can seriously contend that a party has entered into a legal contract with county officers and is entitled to the benefits of a contract, unless there has been a full compliance with the requirements of this section. Graham v. Beacham, 189 Ga. 304, 5 S.E.2d 775 (1939).

Purpose. - Purpose and effect of this section was to furnish a defense for the county against the claim of any contractor with the county who might enter into a contract with the county without compliance with the condition imposed by this section. Ward v. State Hwy. Bd., 172 Ga. 414, 157 S.E. 328 (1931).

Not applicable to municipality. - Requirement of O.C.G.A. § 36-10-1 is not applicable to a municipality. City of Powder Springs v. WMM Properties, Inc., 253 Ga. 753, 325 S.E.2d 155 (1985).

For construction of section as against Act creating county public school system. - See County Bd. of Educ. v. Young, 187 Ga. 644, 1 S.E.2d 739 (1939).

Oral contracts on behalf of a county have repeatedly been held to be void. City of Warrenton v. Johnson, 235 Ga. 665, 221 S.E.2d 429 (1975).

An oral agreement is unenforceable, even though the agreement is embodied or recited in a resolution adopted by the county commissioners and entered on the minutes. Murray County v. Pickering, 42 Ga. App. 739, 157 S.E. 343 (1931).

Subsequent oral modification. - Subsequent modification to a contract with a county may not be oral even though the contract leaves the general purpose and effect of the subject matter of the contract intact. Lester Witte & Co. v. Rabun County, 245 Ga. 382, 265 S.E.2d 4 (1980).

Requirement of entry on minutes not satisfied. - Entry on the minutes of a county board of commissioners concerning preparation of supplemental indexes to the public records of the county does not meet the requirement of this section. Fulton County v. Holland, 71 Ga. App. 455, 31 S.E.2d 202 (1944).

Attempted delegation of contracting power illegal. - Authorization for a county employee to purchase a dumptruck was an attempted delegation of the authority of the commission which was illegal since only the board would have the authority to make such purchase contract. Floyd v. Thomas, 211 Ga. 656, 87 S.E.2d 846 (1955).

Grounds for injunction. - When the petition alleges that the board of commissioners illegally entered into a contract for the purchase of certain automotive equipment by authorizing a county employee to purchase a certain type dumptruck without stating from whom it was to be purchased and at what price, and prays that the defendants be restrained and enjoined from paying for the equipment purchased, it shows a good cause of action for the relief sought, and the court did not err in overruling the general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) thereto. Floyd v. Thomas, 211 Ga. 656, 87 S.E.2d 846 (1955).

Use of word "chairman" and signatures of board members. - When contract was signed for and on behalf of county by the board's chairman, in accordance with the board's directive, it was not necessary, as urged, for the word "chairman" to follow the signature, or for all of the members of the board to sign the contract. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Presumption of warrants' validity. - Contrary not being shown, it will be presumed that county warrants when issued are based upon a valid contract duly recorded as provided in this section. Thompson v. Shurling, 184 Ga. 836, 193 S.E. 880 (1937).

Cited in Douglas v. Austin-Western Rd. Mach. Co., 173 Ga. 834, 161 S.E. 811 (1931); Austin-Western Rd. Mach. Co. v. Fayette County, 99 F.2d 565 (5th Cir. 1938); Rainey v. Marion County, 63 Ga. App. 35, 10 S.E.2d 258 (1940); McCloy v. Christian, 206 Ga. 590, 58 S.E.2d 171 (1950); Bulloch County v. Ritzert, 213 Ga. 818, 102 S.E.2d 40 (1958); Gwinnett County v. Archer, 102 Ga. App. 813, 118 S.E.2d 97 (1960); Polk County v. Anderson, 116 Ga. App. 546, 158 S.E.2d 315 (1967); Robinson Explosives, Inc. v. Dalon Contracting Co., 132 Ga. App. 849, 209 S.E.2d 264 (1974); DeKalb County v. Scruggs, 147 Ga. App. 711, 250 S.E.2d 159 (1978); City of Saint Marys v. Stottler Stagg & Assocs., 163 Ga. App. 45, 292 S.E.2d 868 (1982); Ogletree v. Chester, 682 F.2d 1366 (11th Cir. 1982); Ellenberg v. DeKalb County (In re Maytag Sales & Serv., Inc.), 23 Bankr. 384 (Bankr. N.D. Ga. 1982); Smith v. Gwinnett County, 182 Ga. App. 875, 357 S.E.2d 316 (1987); City of Atlanta v. North By Northwest Civic Ass'n, 262 Ga. 531, 422 S.E.2d 651 (1992); Faulk v. Twiggs County, 269 Ga. 809, 504 S.E.2d 668 (1998); Maner v. Chatham County, 246 Ga. App. 265, 540 S.E.2d 248 (2000); Montgomery County v. Sharpe, 261 Ga. App. 389, 582 S.E.2d 545 (2003).

Enforceability of Contracts

Mandate of this law is absolute and applicable to each and every contract made and executed on behalf of a county; and to be valid and enforceable every contract must conform to these essential requirements. Graham v. Beacham, 189 Ga. 304, 5 S.E.2d 775 (1939).

Nonconforming contracts unenforceable. - If a contract with a county is not in writing, the contract is not enforceable. Killian v. Cherokee County, 169 Ga. 313, 150 S.E. 158 (1929).

If contracts are not in writing and not entered on the minutes, the contracts are not enforceable. Griffin v. Maddox, 181 Ga. 492, 182 S.E. 847 (1935); Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952); Ferguson v. Randolph County, 211 Ga. 103, 84 S.E.2d 70 (1954); Lasky v. Fulton County, 145 Ga. App. 120, 243 S.E.2d 330 (1978).

Any negotiations or oral agreements, or even written agreements that have not been entered on the minutes, fall short of being valid contracts conferring any right upon a party, and will not constitute a basis for an action against a county. Graham v. Beacham, 189 Ga. 304, 5 S.E.2d 775 (1939).

While a person has a legal right to have a written contract made with the county entered on the official minutes, if the contracts are not in writing and not entered on the proper minutes, the contracts are not enforceable. Hatcher v. Hancock County Comm'rs of Rds. & Revenues, 239 Ga. 229, 236 S.E.2d 577 (1977).

Contract with a county is not enforceable unless in writing and entered on the proper minutes. Though unenforceable, the oral lease agreement was not illegal. Overlin v. Boyd, 598 F.2d 423 (5th Cir. 1979).

Contracts entered into by a county were required to be written, and thus, quantum meruit was unavailable against a county; a trial court properly entered summary judgment for a board of education, a school system, a principal, and a superintendent in a former employee's quantum meruit claim against the employees for employment compensation. Harden v. Clarke County Bd. of Educ., 279 Ga. App. 513, 631 S.E.2d 741 (2006).

Negotiations are not contract. - Mere negotiations which contemplate a written contract, followed by a vote of the governing body to accept a bid, will not constitute a contract and may later be reconsidered. Malcom v. Webb, 211 Ga. 449, 86 S.E.2d 489 (1955).

Any negotiations or oral agreements, or even written agreements that have not been entered on the minutes, fall short of being valid contracts and will not constitute a basis for an action against the county. Commercial Credit Corp. v. Mason, 151 Ga. App. 443, 260 S.E.2d 352 (1979).

Duty to pay inapplicable. - When one party furnishes and another accepts valuable services, the law generally imposes a duty to pay, regardless of the intention of the parties, but this theory of recovery is not available when a county is the defendant. PMS Constr. Co. v. DeKalb County, 243 Ga. 870, 257 S.E.2d 285 (1979).

Effect of valid contract not entered upon minutes. - County contract, otherwise valid, is not rendered void by not being entered of record by those whose duty it is to record the contract upon their minutes; but it is, through such failure, rendered unenforceable until the contract is recorded, and mandamus will lie to require its record. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Warrant to pay contract not entered on minutes' record illegal. - When under the facts alleged, the purchase was such a contract as must be entered on the minutes of the commissioners, and was not so entered, the issuance of the warrant to pay off the purchase price of the material was illegal, and the court was not authorized to issue a mandamus absolute, under which the commissioners are required to raise by taxation the specified amount annually as will finally pay the claim. Douglas v. Austin-Western Rd. Mach. Co., 173 Ga. 386, 160 S.E. 409 (1931).

County can be directed to spread a written contract it has entered into on its minutes through a writ of mandamus. Lester Witte & Co. v. Rabun County, 245 Ga. 382, 265 S.E.2d 4 (1980).

No rescission after failure of duty to record. - County commissioners cannot make a contract in behalf of the county, fail to record the contract in discharge of their official duty, and then rescind the contract because the contract is not recorded. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Sovereign immunity barred contract claim. - Claim for breach of contract brought by a homeowner against a county after a sewer line flooded part of the owner's home was barred by sovereign immunity since there was no written contract. Merk v. DeKalb County, 226 Ga. App. 191, 486 S.E.2d 66 (1997).

Contract of sale of timber was not void merely because the contract was not read in full by the county attorney when the attorney presented the contract to the county commissioners for consideration and action, and because the contract was not read by the county commissioners themselves before being acted upon. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Ultra vires contract not enforceable under quantum meruit theory of recovery. - Appellate court erred by holding that an environmental engineering company could recover against a city on the company's quantum meruit claim because quantum meruit was not an available remedy against the city since the claim was based on a municipal contract that was ultra vires as the contract was never approved by city council. City of Baldwin v. Woodard & Curran, Inc., 293 Ga. 19, 743 S.E.2d 381 (2013).

Entry upon Minutes

Duty to enter contracts upon minutes. - Law imposes a duty upon those officers who govern the county's affairs to enter the contracts the officers make in behalf of the county upon the officers' minutes, and the continued neglect on the officer's part to discharge an official duty does not cause the duty to terminate. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Mandamus as remedy. - If the proper county authorities refuse to make the entry, mandamus will lie to compel the authorities to do so, upon the application of a person authorized to institute the proceeding. Jones v. Bank of Cumming, 131 Ga. 614, 63 S.E. 36 (1908); Wagener v. Forsyth County, 135 Ga. 162, 68 S.E. 1115 (1910); King v. Casey, 164 Ga. 117, 137 S.E. 776 (1927).

When a person has a written contract with a county, the person has the legal right to have the contract entered on the minutes of proper authorities and if the proper county authorities fail or refuse to enter such contract, the judge of the superior court should by mandamus compel the authorities to so enter the contract. In a proceeding for mandamus to compel the performance of such duty, the court will not inquire into the validity of the contract further than to see that on the contract's face the contract is prima facie valid. Douglas v. Austin-Western Rd. Mach. Co., 173 Ga. 834, 161 S.E. 811 (1931).

Mandamus will lie to compel a commissioner or the commissioner's successor in office to record a contract, unless the applicant for such relief has with respect thereto been guilty of gross laches, or has permitted an unreasonable period of time to lapse before applying to the proper court therefor. Southern Airways Co. v. Williams, 213 Ga. 38, 96 S.E.2d 889 (1957).

Mandamus available only if contract valid. - The contract must be prima-facie legal to obtain mandamus. Weathers v. Easterling, 153 Ga. 601, 113 S.E. 152 (1922); Board of Comm'rs v. MacDougald Constr. Co., 157 Ga. 595, 122 S.E. 317 (1924).

Mandamus against successors in office. - When the successors in office of the commissioners fail and refuse to enter the contract upon the commissioners' minutes, the commissioners may be compelled by mandamus to do so. Weathers v. Easterling, 153 Ga. 601, 113 S.E. 152 (1922).

Person who has made a valid written contract with the county authorities has a legal right, though a nonresident of the state, to have the contract entered on such minutes. If the county authorities refuse to make the entry, the judge of the superior court should by mandamus compel the county authorities to do so. Milburn v. Commissioners of Glynn County, 112 Ga. 160, 37 S.E. 178 (1900).

Who may apply for mandamus. - When a contractor in the progress of work procured loans from a bank for the purpose of completing the loan, and gave written orders to the bank authorizing the bank to receive the remaining warrants issued under the contract, the bank had such a special interest as authorized the bank to proceed by mandamus to compel the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to enter the building contract on the minutes. Jones v. Bank of Cumming, 131 Ga. 614, 63 S.E. 36 (1908).

Curative effect of mandamus. - Entry after the completion of the work, in compliance with a judgment in mandamus proceedings instituted to compel the entry of the contract on the minutes, cures the defect resulting from a failure to enter the contract on the minutes before the work was begun or completed. Wagener v. Forsyth County, 135 Ga. 162, 68 S.E. 1115 (1910).

No time limit for entering on minutes. - This section does not state when the contract must be entered on the minutes of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) or county commission, nor does the statute say that the contract cannot be reduced to writing or signed by the parties at a date after the contract is made. Burke v. Wheeler County, 54 Ga. App. 81, 187 S.E. 246 (1936).

Statute fixes no limit of time during which a county contract may be entered of record. Malcom v. Fulton County, 209 Ga. 392, 73 S.E.2d 173 (1952).

Sufficiency of entry. - All the material terms of a contract entered into in behalf of a county by the county authorities having jurisdiction over county matters must be in writing and entered on their minutes. Spalding County v. Chamberlin & Co., 130 Ga. 649, 61 S.E. 533 (1908).
